Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5520.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-4-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-4 entitled "Federal
Elective Officers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-4-10. Presidential electors — Time and manner of voting — Election by plurality.
(a) The people of this state, qualified by law to vote for general offices, shall elect as many
electors of president and vice-president of the United States that the state is or shall be entitled to
at town, ward, and district meetings on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November, in
every fourth (4th) year, commencing in 1960, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 19 of
this title, and the several candidates having a plurality of the legal votes given in at the election
shall be elected.
(b) For purposes of electing presidential electors, the state shall be divided into four (4)
groups of municipalities of approximately equal populations, created during the redistricting
process. There shall be one group for each elected member of congress. Votes cast by each group's
voters shall be tallied, with the winner of each group, awarded one electoral vote. The number of
municipality groups shall be based upon the number of electoral votes Rhode Island is entitled to
receive, through the redistricting process.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001299
========